Hawaii statutes.
§201-12.5 Renewable energy facilitator;
establishment; duties. (a) There is established within the department of
business, economic development, and tourism the position of renewable energy
facilitator, which shall be a full-time, temporary position exempt from
chapters 76 and 89. The renewable energy facilitator shall possess a requisite
level of knowledge and expertise in the areas of renewable energy, state and
county permitting processes, and management necessary to carry out the duties
of the position.

(b) The renewable energy facilitator shall
have the following duties:

(1) Facilitate the efficient permitting of renewable
energy projects, including:

(A) The land parcel on which the facility is
situated;

(B) Any renewable energy production structure
or equipment;

(C) Any energy transmission line from the
facility to a public utility's electricity system; and

(D) Any on-site infrastructure necessary for
the production of electricity or biofuel from the renewable energy site;

(2) Initiate the implementation of key renewable
energy projects by permitting various efficiency improvement strategies
identified by the department;

(3) Administer the day-to-day coordination for
renewable energy projects on behalf of the department; and

(4) Submit periodic reports to the legislature on
renewable energy facilitation activities.

(c) The renewable energy facilitator position
shall be funded by the energy security special fund. [L 2008, c 208, §2; am L
2009, c 155, §6; am L 2016, c 27, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next